Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.07.927

Conflict with federal requirements—2007 c 36.

If any part of this act is found to be in conflict with federal requirements under the higher education act of 1965, the conflicting part of this act is hereby declared to be inoperative solely to the extent of the conflict and with respect to the agencies directly affected, and such finding or determination shall not affect the operation of the remainder of this act in its application to the agencies concerned. The rules under this act shall meet federal requirements that are a necessary condition for participation of a state agency under the higher education act of 1965, or its successor.

[ 2007 c 36 s 10.]